Washington statutes.
RCW 15.35.180

Records of milk dealers and cooperatives, inspection and audit of.

The director shall examine and audit not less than one time each year or at any other such time the director considers necessary, the books and records, and may photostat such books, records, and accounts of milk dealers and cooperatives licensed or believed subject to license under this chapter for the purpose of determining:

(1) How payments to producers for the milk handled are computed and whether the amount of such payments are in accordance with the applicable marketing plan;

(2) If any provisions of this chapter affecting such payments directly or indirectly have been or are being violated.

No person shall in any way hinder or delay the director in conducting such examination.

The director may accept and use for the purposes of this section any audit made for or by a federal milk market order administrator which provides the information necessary for such purposes.

[ 1991 c 239 s 13; 1971 ex.s. c 230 s 18.]